Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
Article 2 Secretary of the Senate and Clerk of the House of Representatives

Cross references.

Legislative employees, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. IV, Para. IV.

28-3-20.
Election and term of office; procedure for filling vacancies.

There shall be a Secretary of the Senate and a Clerk of the House of Representatives, elected by the members of each house respectively by recorded vote; and a majority of votes cast is necessary to elect. Their terms of office shall be the time for which the members of the General Assembly are elected and until their successors are elected.

In the event of a vacancy in the office of Clerk of the House or the permanent disability of the Clerk of the House, the Speaker shall appoint a duly qualified person to succeed to the office of Clerk of the House. Any question concerning the existence of permanent disability of the Clerk of the House shall be determined by the Speaker with the concurrence of a majority of the chairmen of the standing committees of the House. Any person succeeding to the office of Clerk of the House pursuant to this subsection shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

In the event of a vacancy in the office of Secretary of the Senate while the Senate is not in session or the permanent disability of the Secretary of the Senate while the Senate is not in session, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint a duly qualified person to succeed to the office of Secretary of the Senate. Any person succeeding to the office of Secretary of the Senate pursuant to this paragraph shall serve until the next session of the General Assembly, at which time the Senate shall elect a duly qualified person to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term, if any.

In the event of a vacancy in the office of the Secretary of the Senate while the Senate is in session or the permanent disability of the Secretary of the Senate while the Senate is in session, the Senate shall elect a duly qualified person to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Any question concerning the existence of permanent disability of the Secretary of the Senate shall be determined by the President of the Senate with the concurrence of a majority of the chairmen of the standing committees of the Senate.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 188; Code 1868, § 182; Code 1873, § 194; Code 1882, § 194; Civil Code 1895, § 315; Civil Code 1910, § 358; Code 1933, § 47-201; Ga. L. 1983, p. 494, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 656, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 622, § 1.

Cross references.

Recorded vote required in General Assembly elections, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. IV, Para. X.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 494, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article III, Section IV, Paragraph X of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

28-3-21.
[Reserved] Bond for discharge of duties.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 185, § 3; Code 1882, § 198; Civil Code 1895, § 320; Civil Code 1910, § 363; Code 1933, § 47-204; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 177, § 1, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 177, § 1 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2006.

28-3-22.
Duties when both branches of the General Assembly meet in single chamber.

When there is a meeting of both branches of the General Assembly in one chamber, the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives shall be present and join in the discharge of the duties required, and each shall enter the proceedings in the journal of his respective house.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 196; Code 1868, § 190; Code 1873, § 202; Code 1882, § 202; Civil Code 1895, § 324; Civil Code 1910, § 367; Code 1933, § 47-205.

28-3-23.
Compensation, expenses, and allowances; travel expenses.

The Secretary of the Senate shall receive such compensation, expenses, and allowances as shall be provided by resolution of the Senate; and the Clerk of the House of Representatives shall receive such compensation, expenses, and allowances as shall be provided by resolution of the House of Representatives.

The Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives shall receive traveling expenses when traveling in the service of the state by motor vehicle as provided for in Code Section 50-19-7.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 458, § 1.

28-3-24.
Procedure for distributing bills, resolutions, and other documents; fees.

The Legislative Services Committee shall provide a procedure for the distribution by the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives of bills, resolutions, calendars, status sheets, and other documents. Such procedure may be changed from time to time by the committee and may include a schedule or schedules of fees to be charged for such documents. All funds received as a result of such fees by the Secretary and the Clerk shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1577; Code 1868, § 1639; Code 1873, § 1645; Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 185, § 1; Code 1882, § 1645; Civil Code 1895, § 286; Civil Code 1910, § 321; Code 1933, § 47-210; Ga. L. 1967, p. 268, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 28; Ga. L. 1985, p. 511, § 1.

28-3-24.1.
Public distribution of legislative information in electronic format.

It is the policy of the General Assembly that legislative information concerning the activities of the General Assembly may be made readily and widely available in electronic format on a timely basis.

The Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives may provide legislative information in electronic format to the GeorgiaNet Division of the Georgia Technology Authority for purposes of public distribution as provided in Code Section 50-25-14. The information may be provided on at least a daily basis in the most current format available. The information provided may include at a minimum: available schedules and agenda for committee meetings; available bill and resolution status information; and full text of all available prefiled and introduced versions of bills and resolutions, including amendments and substitutes. The information provided may include such other matters as will in the determination of the Secretary and the Clerk contribute to the purposes of this Code section. The Georgia Technology Authority shall work with the General Assembly to develop a single Internet site for the Georgia General Assembly. The content and the format of the General Assembly Internet site shall be determined by the Legislative Services Committee.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-3-24.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 720, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 249, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note on 2000 amendment of this Code section, see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 280 (2000).

28-3-24.2.
“Official written communication” defined; electronic format and requirements.

As used in this Code section, the term “official written communication” means any report, notice, or other written correspondence required by the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, as now or hereafter amended, to be provided to officers, members, or employees of the General Assembly.

It is the policy of the General Assembly that whenever an official written communication is sent to officers, members, or employees of the General Assembly such communication shall be in an electronic format that creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient thereof and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by such a recipient.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-3-24.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 346, § 1/SB 60.

28-3-25.
Oath of office.

The Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives, before entering on the discharge of their duties, shall take an oath before the respective presiding officers of the two houses to discharge their duties faithfully and to the best of their skill and knowledge. Said oath should be entered in the journals of the respective houses.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 189; Code 1868, § 183; Code 1873, § 195; Code 1882, § 195; Civil Code 1895, § 316; Civil Code 1910, § 359; Code 1933, § 47-202.